Wyoming, session 2025, SF0086.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-2-802(a)(ii) by creating a new
subparagraph (D) is amended to read:
21-2-802. Powers and duties; teacher certification;
suspension and revocation; certification fees; disposition
of collected fees; required data submissions to department
of education.
(a) The board shall promulgate rules and regulations:
(ii) In addition to paragraph (a)(i) of this
section, the board shall by rule and regulation provide
for:
(D) Alternative certification of teachers
that requires a baccalaureate degree from an accredited
college or university and successful completion of an
accredited or non‑accredited alternative certification
program or pathway approved by the board that at a minimum
requires passage of a subject area examination, pedagogy
examination, United States Constitution examination and
Wyoming Constitution examination. Issuance of this
alternative certification shall be limited to the subject
areas and grade levels successfully completed by the
applicant. If the applicant is enrolled in or has completed
an alternative certification program or pathway the
applicant may apply for employment with a school district.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0086
ENROLLED ACT NO. 72, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2